Maryland, session 2026, HB0764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–901.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0764*

HOUSE BILL 764
(3) “Elected member” means 1 of the 7 elected and voting members of the
Montgomery County Board or a member appointed to fill a vacancy of 1 of these 7 members.
(b) The Montgomery County Board consists of:
(1) 5 elected members, each of whom resides in a different board of
education district;
(2) 2 elected members who may reside anywhere in the county; and
(3) 1 student member.
3–902.
(b) (1) An elected member of the county board is entitled to receive[:
(i) $25,000 annually as compensation; or
(ii) An annual salary set through legislation based on the
recommendations of the Montgomery County Board of Education Compensation
Commission in accordance with Title 28, Subtitle 1A of the Local Government Article]
ANNUALLY AS COMPENSATION THE SAME COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, OTHER THAN THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, IN EFFECT AT THE BEGINNING OF THE ELECTED
MEMBER’S TERM.
(2) The president of the county board is entitled to receive[:
(i) $29,000 annually as compensation; or
(ii) An annual salary set through legislation based on the
recommendations of the Montgomery County Board of Education Compensation
Commission in accordance with Title 28, Subtitle 1A of the Local Government Article]
ANNUALLY AS COMPENSATION $10,000 MORE THAN THE COMPENSATION OF A
MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, OTHER THAN THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE, IN EFFECT AT THE BEGINNING OF THE
PRESIDENT’S TERM.
(3) An elected member is entitled to health insurance and to other fringe
benefits regularly provided to employees of the board of education under the same terms
and conditions extended to other employees of the board of education.
(4) A salary increase for an elected member under this subsection shall
take effect at the beginning of the term of office and may not increase during the term of
office.

HOUSE BILL 764 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the president and members of the Montgomery County Board
of Education while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act,
but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the president and
members of the Montgomery County Board of Education shall take effect at the beginning
of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed
or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.